Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 2
EVIDENCE OF INCONSISTENT STATEMENTS - VARIANCE

16-10-201. Inconsistent statement of witness - competency of evidence.

Where a witness in a criminal trial has made a previous statement inconsistent with his testimony at the trial, the previous inconsistent statement may be shown by any otherwise competent evidence and is admissible not only for the purpose of impeaching the testimony of the witness, but also for the purpose of establishing a fact to which his testimony and the inconsistent statement relate, if:

The witness, while testifying, was given an opportunity to explain or deny the statement or the witness is still available to give further testimony in the trial; and

The previous inconsistent statement purports to relate to a matter within the witness's own knowledge.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 238, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-201.

16-10-202. Variance - allegations and proof.

When on the trial of any indictment, information, felony complaint, or complaint for any offense there appears to be any variance between the statements in the indictment, complaint, or information and the evidence offered in proof thereof, of any given name or surname, or both given name and surname, or other description whatever of any person who is therein named or described, or in the name or description of any matter or thing whatsoever therein named or described, such variance is not grounds for the acquittal of the defendant, unless the court before which such trial be had finds such variance is material to the merits of the case or may be prejudicial to the defendant. No indictment, information, felony complaint, or complaint shall be deemed insufficient nor shall the trial, judgment, or other proceedings thereon be reversed or affected by any defect which does not tend to prejudice the substantial rights of the defendant on the merits.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 239, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-10-202.

L. 73:

p. 499, § 4.